hyph/src/main/resources/com/itextpdf/hyph/el.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>

<!-- these hyphenation rules have been created for FOP by Dimitris Kamenopoulos (d.kamenopoulos@mail.ntua.gr). 
	They support modern (monotonico) greek. They are
 	based on the excellent hyphenation file GRMTex.tex 
	by Dimitrios Fillipou.
 	found in the TexGreek distribution. However there are quite a few differences. In particular, this file contains real greek characters rather than their latin tex subtitutes and so it is a rewrite, not a copy. Therefore, since it hasn't been tested as much as its tex predecessor, do contact me if you spot any errors.--> 
<hyphenation-info>

<hyphen-char value="-" />
<hyphen-min before="2" after="2" />
<classes>
αΑ
άΆ
βΒ
γΓ
δΔ
εΕ
έΈ
ζΖ
ηΗ
ήΉ
Θθ
ιΙ
ίΊ
ϊΪ
ΐ
ϋΫ
ΰ
όΌ
ύΎ
κΚ
λΛ
μΜ
νΝ
ξΞ
οΟ
πΠ
ρΡ
σΣς
τΤ
υΥ
φΦ
χΧ
ψΨ
ώΏ
ωΩ
</classes>
<exceptions>
δι-ά
ποι-όν
ποι-ού
</exceptions>
<patterns>
4β1ζ 
4β1θ 
4β1ν 
4β1ξ 
4β1π 
4β1σ 
4β1τ 
3β1φ 
4β1χ 
3β1ψ 
4γ1β 
4γ2ζ 
4γ1θ 
4γ1μ 
4ρ5γ2μ
4γ1χ   
4γ1π 
4γ1τ 
4γ1φ 
4γ1χ 
4γ1ψ 
4δ1β 
4δ1γ 
4δ1ζ 
4δ1κ 
4δ1λ 
4δ1ξ 
4δ1π 
4δ1σ 
4δ1τ 
4δ1χ 
4δ1ψ 
4ζ1β 
4ζ1δ 
4ζ1θ 
4ζ1κ 
4ζ1λ 
4ζ1μ 
τζ2μ 
4ζ1ν 
4ζ1ξ 
4ζ1π 
4ζ1ρ 
4ζ1σ 
4ζ1τ 
4ζ1φ 
4ζ1χ 
4ζ1ψ 
4θ1β 
4θ1γ 
4θ1δ 
4θ1ζ 
4κ1κ 
4κ1π 
4κ1χ 
4κ1ψ 
4λ1β 
4λ1γ 
4λ1δ 
4λ1ζ 
4λ1θ 
4λ1κ 
4λ1μ 
4λ1ν 
4λ1ξ 
4λ1π 
4λ1ρ 
4λ1σ 
4λ1τ 
4λ1φ 
4λ1χ 
4λ1ψ 
4μ1β 
4μ1γ 
4μ1δ 
4μ1ζ 
4μ1θ 
4μ1κ 
4μ1λ 
4μ1φ 
4μ1χ
4μ1ψ
4ν1β
4ν1γ
4ν1δ
4ν1ζ
4ν1θ
4ν1κ
4ν1λ
4ν1μ
4ν1ξ
4ν1π
4ν1ρ
4ν1σ
4ν1φ
4ν1χ
4ν1ψ
4ξ1β
4ξ1γ
4ξ1δ
4ξ1ζ
4ξ1θ
4ξ1κ
4ξ1λ
4ξ1μ
4ξ1ν
4ξ1π
4ξ1ρ
4ξ1σ
4ξ1τ
4γ4ξ2τ
4ρ4ξ2τ
4ξ1φ
4ξ1χ
4ξ1ψ
4π1β
4π1γ
4π1δ
4π1ζ
4π1θ
4π1κ
4π1μ
4π1ξ
4π1σ
4π1φ
4π1χ
4π1ψ
4ρ1β
4ρ1γ
4ρ1δ
4ρ1ζ
4ρ1θ
4ρ1κ
4ρ1λ
4ρ1μ
4ρ1ν
4ρ1ξ
4ρ1π
4ρ1σ
4ρ1τ
4ρ1φ
4ρ1χ
4ρ1ψ
4σ1δ
4σ1ζ
4σ1ν
4σ1ξ
4σ1ρ
4σ1ψ
4τ1β
4τ1γ
4τ1δ
4τ1θ
4τ1κ
4τ1ν
4τ1ξ
4τ1π
4τ1φ
στ2φ
4τ1χ
4τ1ψ
4φ1β
4φ1γ
4φ1δ
4φ1ζ
4φ1μ
4φ1ν
4φ1ξ
4φ1π
4φ1σ
4φ1χ
4φ1ψ
4ψ1β
4ψ1γ
4ψ1δ
4ψ1ζ
4ψ1θ
4ψ1κ
4ψ1λ
4ψ1μ
4ψ1ν
4ψ1ξ
4ψ1π
4ψ1ρ
4ψ1σ
4ψ1τ
4ψ1φ
4ψ1χ
α1 
ε1 
η1 
ι1 
ο1 
υ1 
ω1 
ώ1
α2ι 
α2ί 
α2υ 
α2ύ 
ά3υ 
ε2ι 
ε2ί 
ε2υ 
ε2ύ 
έ3υ 
η2υ 
ή3υ 
ο2ι 
ο2ί 
ο2υ
ο2ύ
ό3υ
υ2ι
υ2ί
ύ3ι
α2η
ά3η
α2ϊ
α2ϋ
ε2ϊ
ό2ει
ο2η
ό3η
ο2ϊ
ό3ι
ι2α 
ι2ά 
ι2ε 
ι2έ 
ι2ο 
ι2ό 
4β. 
4γ. 
4γκ. 
4δ. 
4ζ. 
4θ. 
4κ. 
4λ. 
4μ. 
4μπ. 
4ν. 
4ντ. 
4ξ. 
4π. 
4ρ. 
4σ. 
4τ. 
4τζ. 
4τσ. 
4φ. 
4χ. 
4ψ. 
4' 
4β' 
4γκ' 
4ζ' 
4λ' 
4μ' 
4μπ' 
4ν' 
4ντ' 
4ξ' 
4π' 
4ρ' 
4σ' 
4τ' 
4τζ' 
4τσ' 
4φ' 
4χ' 
4ψ' 
.β4 
.γ4 
.δ4 
.ζ4 
.θ4 
.κ4 
.λ4 
.μ4 
.ν4 
.ξ4 
.π4 
.ρ4 
.σ4 
.τ4 
.φ4 
.χ4 
.ψ4 
4β1β 
4γ1γ 
4ζ1ζ 
4θ1θ 
4λ1λ 
4μ1μ 
4ν1ν 
4π1π 
4ρ1ρ 
4σ1σ 
4τ1τ 
τφ1φ 
4χ1χ 
3ψ1ψ 
4γ5κ2φ
4γ1κτ
4μ1πτ
4ν1τζ
4ν1τσ
4βρ.
4γλ.
4κτ.
4γκσ.
4κσ.
4λσ.
4μπλ.
4μπν.
4μπρ.
4μσ.
4νσ.
4ρσ.
4σκ.
4στ.
4τλ.
4τρ.
</patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
